Texas, session 892, HB226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 141, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Section 141.0091 to read as follows: Sec. 141.0091.  ACTIVE RADIO FREQUENCY IDENTIFICATION TAGS REQUIRED. (a) In this section, "active radio frequency identification tag" means a wireless identification system that uses a transmitter and a battery or other active power source to broadcast an electromagnetic radio frequency signal and transmit data without physical contact between the tag and another device. (b)  Subject to Subsection (c), a youth camp operator shall provide each camper with an active radio frequency identification tag capable of tracking the camper's location in the event the camper is missing from the camp or on the occurrence of a severe weather event or another disaster. (c)  A youth camp operator may provide a camper with an active radio frequency identification tag under this section only if the operator obtains the written consent of the camper's parent or legal guardian. (d)  The executive commissioner shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.